Washington statutes.
RCW 35.76.050

Cost-audit examination and report.

The state auditor shall annually make a cost-audit examination of street records for each city and town and make a written report thereon to the legislative body of each city and town. The expense of the examination shall be paid out of that portion of the motor vehicle fund allocated to the cities and towns and withheld for use by the state department of transportation under the terms of RCW 46.68.110(1).

[ 1995 c 301 s 50; 1984 c 7 s 22; 1965 c 7 s 35.76.050. Prior: 1963 c 115 s 5.]